Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 1

Drifting and Floating Timber [Repealed]

43-28-101 — 43-28-111. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 43-28-101 — 43-28-111 (Acts 1901, ch. 29, §§ 1-6; Shan., §§ 3608a89-3608a99; Code 1932, §§ 6782-6792; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 68-101 — 68-111), concerning drifting and floating timber, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 179, § 1.